Massachusetts, session 194th, H2543.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 51 of chapter 111 is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first paragraph,
the following new sentence:-
“If any licensed facility is unable to provide the services required by said license,
requiring the diversion or temporary pause in service of patients on three or more occasions in an
calendar year, the Department shall immediately convene a public hearing in the community
served by said facility and shall, at the Department’s sole discretion, consider corrective actions,
including but not limited to revocation of said facility’s license.”
of 1